Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 11 Administration

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 5, provides: “The title 39 recodification in this act is the result of the work of a task force appointed by the governor and the legislative management council in 1995. The task force met for the first time in November of 1995 and presented the draft legislation to the joint revenue interim committee in October of 1997.”

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 6, provides: “This act is intended simply as a recodification. The Wyoming legislature intends to make no substantive change to prior law including, but not limited to revenue, either increases or decreases, powers, duties, authorities, obligations, definitions, administration, confidentiality, imposition, tax rates, exemptions, licenses, permits, compliance, collection procedures, enforcement, remedies, statutes of limitation or distribution of taxes. This act is not intended to affect the validity of any rule or regulation promulgated prior to the effective date of this act.”

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 7, provides:

“(a) Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.

“(b) The purpose of this act is to conform title 39 and any other title 39 amendments to the format adopted for recodification. The legislative service office is authorized to conform any other bill passed by the legislature during the 1998 special session which amends or references title 39 to the format adopted by this bill.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

85 C.J.S. Taxation § 1694, 1695, 1702, 1718, 1720, 1735.

§ 39-11-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act unless otherwise specifically provided:

“Assessed value” means taxable value;

“Assessment roll” means the official list of taxable property for the ensuing tax year and may include taxes due thereon;

“Board” means the state board of equalization or its authorized agent;

“Department” means the department of revenue or its authorized agent;

“Director” means the director of the department of revenue;

“Fair market value” means the amount in cash, or terms reasonably equivalent to cash, a well informed buyer is justified in paying for a property and a well informed seller is justified in accepting, assuming neither party to the transaction is acting under undue compulsion, and assuming the property has been offered in the open market for a reasonable time, except, fair market value of agricultural land shall be determined as provided by W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x) and fair market value of mine products shall be determined as provided by W.S. 39-14-103(b), 39-14-203(b), 39-14-303(b), 39-14-403(b), 39-14-503(b), 39-14-603(b) and 39-14-703(b);

“Intangible personal property” means personal property that lacks mass and cannot be seen, felt, weighed, measured or otherwise perceived by the senses; property that has no physical existence beyond merely representational. Intangible property’s value lies chiefly in what it represents, and its existence may be evidenced by a document;

“In transit property” means manufactured goods, wares, seed, feed, fertilizer, tools, supplies and merchandise which is in interstate commerce, or, Wyoming assembled or manufactured products being held for out-of-state sale, which are consigned or placed in any storage area in Wyoming for storage, repackaging, processing, fabricating, milling, disassembly or assembly in transit to a final destination outside Wyoming whether the destination is specified before or after the transportation begins;

“Inventories” means any personal property held for resale consisting of goods, wares or merchandise including stocks of raw or finished material, unassembled parts, work in progress or finished products constituting the inventory of a merchant or manufacturer;

“Livestock” means horses, cattle, mules and asses, sheep, swine, goats and all other animals commonly thought of as livestock;

“Manufacturer” means any person who purchases, receives or holds personal property for the purpose of adding to the value thereof, by any process of manufacturing, refining, purifying, or by the combination of different materials, and with a purpose to make a gain or profit by sale thereof;

“Merchant” means any person owning, possessing or controlling personal property with a purpose to sell the property at an advanced price or profit, or any person controlling personal property which has been consigned to the person from outside Wyoming to be sold within Wyoming;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, company or any other type of association and any agent or officer of any partnership, corporation, company or other type of association;

“Property used for industrial purposes” means those properties valued under W.S. 39-13-102(m)(ii) through (x), excluding W.S. 39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), and those properties used or held for use for:

Manufacturing, milling, converting, producing, processing or fabricating materials;

The extraction or processing of minerals;

The mechanical, chemical or electronic transformation of property into new products.

“Real property” means land and appurtenances, including structures, affixed thereto, and any intangible characteristic which contributes to the fair market value thereof;

“Tangible personal property” means personal property that, by its nature, is perceptible to the senses; property that has a physical presence beyond merely representational and that is capable of being touched; property that is able to be perceived as materially existent; property that is not intangible;

“Taxable value” means a percent of the fair market value of property in a particular class as follows:

Gross product of minerals and mine products, one hundred percent (100%);

Property used for industrial purposes, eleven and one-half percent (11.5%);

All other property, real and personal, including property valued and assessed under W.S. 39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

“This act” means W.S.

39-11-101

through

39-22-111

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2003, ch. 202, § 1; 2005, ch. 62, § 1; 2006, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 31, § 1; 2007, ch. 4, § 1; 2015 ch. 21, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective January 1, 2005, added “and any intangible which contributes to the fair market value thereof” in (a)(v).

The 2006 amendments.

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 5, § 1, inserted “characteristic” in (a)(xv).

Laws 2006, ch. 5, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2006.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, effective January 1, 2007, rewrote the definitions of intangible property in (a)(vii) and of tangible property in (a)(xvi).

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

inserted “excluding W.S. 39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix)” in (xiv); in (xvii), deleted “Beginning January 1, 1989” at the beginning of the introductory paragraph; inserted “including property valued and assessed under W.S. 39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix)” in (C); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment

substituted “W.S. 39-13-102(m)(ii) through (x)” for “W.S. 39-13-102(m)(ii) through (viii)” in the introductory language of (a)(xiv).

Laws 2015, ch. 21, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xviii), substituted "W.S.

39-11-101

through

39-22-111

" for "W.S.

39-11-101

through

39-19-111

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Intangible property. —

The word “includes,” as used in the definition of intangible personal property under former § 39-1-101(a)(vii) (now see paragraph (a)(vii) of this section), was a term of enlargement and not one of limitation. RT Communications, Inc. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 11 P.3d 915,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 2000).

The state board of equalization was correct in treating acquisition adjustments as intangible personal property of telephone companies pursuant to former § 39-1-101(a)(vii) (now see paragraph (a)(vii) of this section) as the acquisition adjustments did not reflect real or physical property that had value intrinsic to it and, instead, the value reflected by the acquisition adjustments related to values associated with the business of the utilities such as goodwill, the certificate of convenience, and franchise rights. RT Communications, Inc. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 11 P.3d 915,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 2000).

Tax exempt property. —

A utility's tax exempt property would be valued, for tax assessment purposes, using the same valuation method as that used for its taxable property, in order to assure an ultimate fair market value, as commanded by paragraph (a)(vi) and Wyo. Const., art. 15, § 11. Pacificorp, Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2001 WY 84, 31 P.3d 64,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2001).

Fair market value defined. —

County assessor's valuation of the taxpayer's personal property for ad valorem tax assessments at the taxpayer's coal mines, which were purchased in 1998, was supported by substantial evidence because the assessor's use of the 1998 purchase price, rather than the original cost of the individual items of property, as the starting place for the cost method of appraisal was consistent with the regulations, applicable law, and guidelines, which seemed to direct it. Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-13-103(b)(ii) required that property be valued at its fair market value as defined in this section for property tax purposes, and the 1998 purchase price was a much better indicator of what a willing buyer would pay a willing seller for the property in an arms length transaction. Thunder Basin Coal Co. v. Campbell County, 2006 WY 44, 132 P.3d 801,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2006).

Standing of county commissioners board. —

Board of county commissioners lacked standing to appeal decision of state board of equalization, since board of county commissioners was not included in definition of “person” and was not otherwise provided with a right of appeal. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1999).

Standing of county assessor. —

County assessor lacked standing to appeal State Board of Equalization's decision to district court as county officers are not persons within definition given in subsection (a)(xiii) of this section and former § 39-1-306 does not provide county assessor with right of appeal from the State Board of Equalization's decision. Brandt v. TCI Cablevision, 873 P.2d 595,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1994).

County assessor did not create unconstitutional subclass of property. —

By refusing to allow first year depreciation and by establishing the 40% floor for depreciation of its used equipment, the county assessor did not create an unconstitutional subclass of property because other property within the industrial property class was not valued under the same methodology. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 899 P.2d 855,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

The Computer Assisted Mass Appraisal method

conforms with the equal and uniform taxation requirements of the constitution. Gray v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 896 P.2d 1347,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Collier v. Hilltop Nat'l Bank, 920 P.2d 1241,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1996); Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002); Airtouch Communs., Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2003 WY 114, 76 P.3d 342,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2003)Milnes v. Milnes, 2008 WY 11, 175 P.3d 1164,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Feb. 1, 2008).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

§ 39-11-102.
Administration; confidentiality; department of revenue.

Taxpayer rights. The following provisions shall apply to this act:

The department shall publish and make available a list of taxpayer rights in the area of state tax administration and collection, written in plain language, which includes the following rights:

A right to taxpayer information services including a location where taxpayers may request copies of public records or obtain explanations of billings and information about their rights and responsibilities;

A right to assurance that no employee of the state shall receive a bonus, be promoted or in any way rewarded on the basis of the amount of assessments or collections from taxpayers;

A right to confidentiality as to records protected against disclosure by statute;

A right, if a tax has accrued penalty and interest because the taxpayer relied on erroneous written information or written answers from the state, that the penalty and interest shall not be assessed, provided that the pertinent facts and circumstances disclosed by the taxpayer were substantially correct and complete;

A right to enter into installment payment agreements on tax assessments for tax liabilities where repayment requirements are met and where payment in a lump sum would cause severe inconvenience to the taxpayer;

A right to assessment notices that describe in plain terms the basis for assessments and describe the procedures for appeal.

Any taxpayer may bring an action to enjoin any violation of the rights provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection. The list of taxpayer rights and enforcement provisions provided in this section are supplemental to other rights provided by law.

The department of revenue is created pursuant to W.S.

9-2-2007

. The governor shall appoint a director who shall exercise all management authority over agency personnel. The director may formulate the policies and programs to be carried out by the department through its respective divisions and adopt suitable rules and regulations pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

In addition to the other powers and duties imposed by law, the department shall:

Coordinate collection of state taxes, assessments, licenses, fees and other monies as designated by law;

Insure specialized service for tax enforcements, through establishment and maintenance of uniformity in definition, regulation, return and payment;

Insure avoidance of duplication in state facilities for tax collections that involve seasonal or occasional increases of staff, duplication of audits and wasteful travel expenses;

Safeguard tax and other collections wherever received until duly deposited in the state treasury;

Provide an advisory service on fiscal status, processes and needs of state government, including periodic reports on payments, receipts and debts;

Designate divisions to enforce the laws of this state relating to collections of taxes, fees and all monies, and to delegate the authority necessary to the heads of the divisions to enforce state laws;

Prescribe standard procedures for receiving, receipting, safeguarding and periodically reporting all state revenue receipts, whether current, delinquent, penalty, interest, refunds or otherwise, and the amounts, kinds and terms of items, either collected or still outstanding, to be summarized, studied and reported;

Specify the amount of land for mines or mining claims to which the ad valorem tax or assessment of coal lands provisions of the constitution apply. For purposes of this paragraph, all real and tangible personal property used underground in mining or used within the well in oil or gas exploration or production which historically has not been assessed and taxed based on the 1941 and 1963 attorney general opinions and which remains underground until its value is consumed in the production of the mineral shall be considered part of the mine or mining claim to which the ad valorem tax applies. The taxpayer may remove the equipment from underground for repair or to meet statutory or regulatory requirements, and such removal shall not be considered by the assessor in determining whether the property shall be separately assessed. The following apply to underground equipment:

Equipment which is permanently underground is not subject to separate assessment;

Equipment which is intended or otherwise designed to be consumed underground in the production of the mineral shall not be separately assessed for taxation during the normal course of mining or oil or gas exploration or production;

Except as provided by this paragraph, equipment which is removed from underground shall be treated as tangible personal property and assessed accordingly.

Require persons to furnish information concerning all relevant matters pertaining to property owned by them for purposes of taxation;

Furnish the governor all information he may require relative to tax matters, and annually transmit to the governor on or before the third Monday of December and to each member of the legislature on or before the second Tuesday in January, the report of the department for the year showing in tabulated form all taxable property in the state and its value;

Require the attorney general or district attorneys in their respective districts to assist in the commencement and prosecution of actions and proceedings for penalties, forfeitures, removals and punishments for violations of the laws of the state respecting the assessment and taxation of property, and to represent the department or board in any litigation in which they may become involved in the discharge of their duties;

Decide all questions that may arise with reference to the construction of any statute affecting the assessment, levy and collection of taxes, in accordance with the rules, regulations, orders and instructions prescribed by the department;

Institute or cause to be instituted any proceedings, either civil or criminal, provided by law as a punishment for the neglect, failure or refusal to obey any lawful requirement or order by the department, or to prevent the violation or disobedience of any lawful requirement or order, or to compel their enforcement;

Prescribe forms for uniform schedules, consistent with W.S. 39-13-103(b)(viii), rolls and other documents, and draft and require the use of a standard form of tax notice by each of the several counties to uniformly designate, detail and total the levies and valuations established within the counties;

Prescribe the system of establishing the fair market value of all property valued for property taxation to ensure that all property within a class is uniformly valued. The county assessor and the facilities of his office, together with the deputy assessors and clerical assistants in each county, at the direction of the department, shall give full aid in the installation of the prescribed system in the county. The county shall also furnish the necessary supplies and records for installing the system;

Confer with, advise and give necessary instructions and directions to county assessors as to their duties under the laws of the state. The department or its designee shall officially visit each county of the state annually and inquire into the method of assessment and taxation and ascertain whether the assessors faithfully discharge their duties, particularly as to their compliance with the laws requiring the assessment of all property not exempt from taxation;

Direct proceedings, actions and prosecutions to be instituted to enforce the laws relating to the liability and punishment of persons for failure or neglect to comply with the provisions of the laws of this state governing the return, assessment and taxation of property, and cause complaints to be made against county assessors, members of county boards of equalization, or any other assessing or taxing officers, to the proper authority, for their removal from office for misconduct or neglect of duty;

Monitor the work in progress in the office of each county assessor to determine that procedures and formulae promulgated by the department are being strictly observed and applied;

Promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions hereof as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, necessary to the enforcement of the provisions of any or all tax and other revenue measures which are administered by the department;

Promulgate rules and regulations under which the department may offset any taxes or fees due and payable under title 39, Wyoming statutes and any taxes or fees due and payable to a state agency under title 31, Wyoming statutes, from any other funds owed to the taxpayer by the state or any political subdivision thereof. All state agencies and political subdivisions in Wyoming are subject to these rules with regard to the department’s offset authority;

Map and keep record of the geographical boundaries for all governmental entities with authority to levy property taxes, for administration of tax districts;

Map and keep record of the geographical boundaries for all special districts in the state;

Review boundaries for proposed special districts pursuant to W.S. 22-29-109(a);

Promulgate rules and regulations as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, necessary to map and keep record of the geographical boundaries for all special districts and governmental entities with the authority to levy or require the levy of property taxes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no special district or governmental entity with authority to levy or require the levy of property taxes shall levy any property taxes unless in compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this subsection; and

Promulgate rules and regulations as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to be followed by all county assessors to ensure the use of appropriate statistical tests for assessed values of residential properties to protect against the statistical likelihood that any property in any stratum is over assessed.

The following shall be adopted in accordance with the requirements and procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act:

Adoption of any manual, formula, method or system to be used to determine the fair market value of property for tax purposes;

Adoption of standards, guidelines, criteria or methods to implement paragraph (c)(xv) of this section.

The enumeration of specific actions or decisions which must be implemented by a properly adopted rule set forth in subsection (d) of this section is not exclusive and does not limit in any way the applicability of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to other actions or decisions of the department.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2003, ch. 27, § 1; 2005, ch. 108, § 2; 2008, ch. 22, § 1; 2009, ch. 116, § 1; 2016 ch. 46, § 1, effective March 4, 2016.

The 2005 amendment

added (c)(xxiv); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the second sentence in (c)(xxiv).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (c)(xxv) and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment

, in (c)(xxv), deleted “statistical quality and fairness of assessed values of residential properties, improved and unimproved, computed using sales comparison methods, and which require county assessors to provide statistical parameter data annually to the state board of equalization to demonstrate compliance with the rules. The rules shall specifically address any adjustments made by a county assessor in input data to, or assessed values obtained from, the county's computer assisted mass appraisal system, the method of establishing strata for sales ratio studies, the adequacy of the number of arms-length sales to be used in any sales comparison analyses, and the” following “assessors to ensure the”, inserted “for assessed values of residential properties” following “Statistical tests” and deleted the last two sentences.

Laws 2016, ch. 46 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 116, § 2, provides: “In preparing the rules required by section 1 of this act, the department of revenue shall consider the published rules and procedures in other states employing a computer assisted mass appraisal system. The rules shall comply with generally accepted statistical methods and the International Association of Appraisal Officers standards.”

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to develop an accurate and comprehensive database of the property within each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of property taxes within that governmental entity. Regardless of the date of formation, each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of ad valorem taxes shall file a map or legal description designating the current geographical boundaries of the governmental entity with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the entity is located in accordance with the department's rules regarding tax districts. Not later than August 1, 2005, the department shall notify each governmental entity subject to the provisions of this section of the entity's most recent filing with the department and whether that filing meets the requirements of this act. If a governmental entity subject to the provisions of this act has not met the requirements of this act, or if its most recent filing with the department is no longer accurate, it shall file not later than November 1, 2005 a map or other legal description of its current boundaries in accordance with this act and the department's rules on taxing districts. Thereafter, filings shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Board may not usurp valuation function assigned to department. —

In reviewing final decision of department of revenue, board of equalization erred where it departed from its adjudicatory role and assumed function of prescribing system of establishing fair market value, which was statutorily assigned to department. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 12 P.3d 668,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2000).

State and department had standing to appeal evaluation decision of board of equalization.

The board's allocation of a coal company's reclamation costs to nonmining activities and the board's allowance of a deduction from the taxable value of the coal provided a direct and significant negative impact on the amount of ad valorem and severance taxes collected by the state. The department, as the administrative agency charged with the collection of tax revenues for the state, served as the primary agent of the state in tax matters. Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Antelope Valley Imp. & Serv. Dist. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 992 P.2d 563,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1999); BP America Prod. Co. v. Department of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Mar. 14, 2006).

Stated in

Town of Pine Bluffs v. Eisele, 2017 WY 117, 403 P.3d 126,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of IRS to compel production of tax records and books for purposes of audit under taxpayer compliance measurement program, 69 ALR Fed 786.